Idaho statutes. Title 49 MOTOR VEHICLES
Chapter 6
RULES OF THE ROAD

Sec.

§ 49-601. Application.

The provisions of this chapter relate exclusively to the operation of vehicles upon highways, except where a different place is specifically referred to in a given section.

They shall not apply to persons, motor vehicles and equipment while actually engaged in work upon a highway, or to owners or operators of a ditch, canal, conduit or drain while engaged in work within and pursuant to a right-of-way for a ditch, canal, conduit or drain, but shall apply to persons, owners, operators and vehicles when traveling to or from that work.

§ 49-602. Unattended motor vehicle.

No person driving or in charge of a motor vehicle shall permit it to stand unattended without first locking the vehicle if the engine is running, effectively setting the parking brake and, when standing upon any grade, turning the front wheels to the curb or side of the highway. The provisions of this section do not apply to motor vehicles on private property.

§ 49-603. Starting parked vehicle.

No person shall start movement of a vehicle which is stopped, standing or parked unless movement can be made with reasonable safety.

§ 49-604. Limitations on backing.

The driver of a vehicle shall not back the vehicle unless that movement can be made with safety and without interfering with other traffic.

The driver of a vehicle shall not back it upon any shoulder or lane of travel of any controlled-access highway.

§ 49-605. Driving upon sidewalk.

No person shall drive any vehicle upon a sidewalk or sidewalk area except upon a permanent or temporary driveway. This section shall not apply to any vehicle moved exclusively by human power, a personal delivery device, an electric personal assistive mobility device, nor to any motorized wheelchair. For the purposes of assuring the safety of pedestrians and others using sidewalks, a political subdivision having jurisdiction over sidewalks may, by ordinance or by traffic control device, regulate the time, place and manner of the operation of electric personal assistive mobility devices.

§ 49-606. Coasting prohibited.

The driver of any motor vehicle when traveling upon a downgrade shall not coast with the gear or transmission in neutral nor with the clutch disengaged.

§ 49-607. Opening and closing vehicle doors.

No person shall open the door of a motor vehicle on a side available to moving traffic unless and until it is reasonably safe to do so and can be done without interfering with the movement of other traffic, nor shall any person leave a door open on a side of a vehicle available to moving traffic for a period of time longer than necessary to load or unload passengers.

§ 49-608. Riding in manufactured homes or commercial coaches.

No person shall occupy a manufactured home or commercial coach while it is being moved upon a highway.

§ 49-609. Persons riding animals or driving animal-drawn vehicles.

Every person riding an animal or driving any animal-drawn vehicle upon a highway shall be granted all of the rights and shall be subject to all of the duties applicable to the driver of a vehicle by this title, except those provisions of this title which, by their very nature, can have no application.

§ 49-610. [Reserved.]

§ 49-612. Obstruction to driver’s view or driving mechanism.

No person shall drive a vehicle when it is so loaded or when there are in the front seat a number of persons exceeding three (3), as to obstruct the view of the driver to the front or the sides of the vehicle, or as to interfere with the driver’s control over the driving mechanism of the vehicle.

No passenger in a vehicle shall ride in a position as to interfere with the driver’s view ahead or to the sides, or to interfere with his control of the driving mechanism of the vehicle.

No vehicle shall be operated when the windshield and/or windows of the vehicle are coated with ice, snow, sleet, or dust to the extent that the driver’s view ahead, or to the sides or rear of the vehicle are obstructed.

§ 49-613. Putting glass or other injurious materials on highway prohibited.

The following shall apply to persons and vehicles not otherwise exempted from the application of this section by federal or state law:

No person shall throw or deposit upon any highway any glass bottle, glass, nails, tacks, wire, cans, or any other substance likely to injure any person, animal or vehicle upon the highway.

Any person who drops, or permits to be dropped or thrown, upon any highway any destructive or injurious material shall immediately remove that material or cause it to be removed.

Any person removing a wrecked or damaged vehicle from a highway shall remove any glass or other injurious substance dropped upon the highway from that vehicle.

No vehicle shall be operated on any public highway unless such vehicle’s load is secured to prevent the load from becoming loose, detached or a hazard to other users of the highway.

No person may operate on any public highway any vehicle with any load unless the load is secured and such covering as required thereon by subsection (6) of this section is securely fastened to prevent the covering or load from becoming loose, detached or a hazard to other users of the highway.

Any vehicle operating on a paved public highway with a load of dirt, sand or gravel susceptible to being dropped, spilled, leaked or otherwise escaping therefrom shall be covered so as to prevent spillage. Covering of such loads is not required if six (6) inches of freeboard is maintained.

The provisions of subsections (5) and (6) of this section shall not apply to a government, quasi-government, their agents or employees or contractors thereof, in performance of maintenance or construction of a highway.

The provisions of subsections (4), (5) and (6) of this section shall not apply to vehicles owned by canal companies, irrigation districts, drainage districts or their boards of control, lateral ditch associations, water districts or other irrigation water delivery or management entities, or operated by any employee or agent of such an entity, performing construction, operation or maintenance of facilities.

The provisions of subsections (4), (5) and (6) of this section shall not apply to vehicles transporting unprocessed agricultural products, agricultural byproducts, agricultural materials or agricultural inputs.

§ 49-614. Stop when traffic obstructed.

No driver shall enter an intersection, a marked crosswalk, or drive onto any railroad grade crossing unless there is sufficient space on the other side of the intersection, crosswalk or railroad grade crossing to accommodate the vehicle he is operating without obstructing the passage of other vehicles, pedestrians or railroad trains, regardless of any traffic control signal indication to proceed.

§ 49-615. Drivers to exercise due care.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this title or the provisions of any local ordinance, every driver of a vehicle shall exercise due care to avoid colliding with any pedestrian or any person propelling a human-powered vehicle and shall give an audible signal when necessary. Every driver shall exercise proper precaution upon observing any child or any obviously confused, incapacitated or intoxicated person.

§ 49-616. Driving through safety zone prohibited.

No vehicle shall at any time be driven through or within a safety zone.

§ 49-617. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 49-618. [Reserved.]

It shall be unlawful to operate a slow moving vehicle on the highways at the following times and under the following circumstances:

From one-half (½) hour after sunset to one-half (½) hour before sunrise, unless the vehicle or equipment is equipped with lights as required by section 49-916, Idaho Code;

At a speed in excess of twenty-five (25) miles per hour, unless the vehicle or equipment, including towed units of farm equipment, is designed to safely travel at speeds in excess of twenty-five (25) miles per hour, but no such vehicle or equipment shall exceed the posted maximum speed limit and shall be operated by a licensed driver;

In such a manner as to obstruct the free movement of traffic on the highways.

A slow moving vehicle shall be equipped with a braking system and with a mechanical signaling device as required for other similarly constructed vehicles.

All slow moving vehicles, farm tractors, road rollers and implements of husbandry shall have affixed at the rear of the vehicle an emblem identifying them as slow moving equipment. The Idaho traffic safety commission shall recommend to the board the minimum standards for the emblem.

Emergency and snow removal vehicles owned and operated by the state or its political subdivisions when en route to, from, or in the performance of activities essential to the public safety, shall be exempt from the provisions of paragraphs (a) and (c) of subsection (1) of this section.

§ 49-620. [Reserved.]

§ 49-623. Authorized emergency or police vehicles.

The driver of an authorized emergency or police vehicle, when responding to an emergency call, or when in the pursuit of an actual or suspected violator of the law, or when responding to but not upon returning from a fire alarm, may exercise the privileges set forth in this section, but subject to the conditions stated.

The driver of an authorized emergency or police vehicle may:

Park or stand, irrespective of the parking or standing provisions of this title;

Proceed past a red or stop signal or stop sign, but only after slowing down as may be necessary for safe operation;

Exceed the maximum speed limits so long as he does not endanger life or property;

Disregard regulations governing direction of movement or turning in specified directions.

The exemptions granted to an authorized emergency or police vehicle shall apply when necessary to warn and to make use of an audible signal having a decibel rating of at least one hundred (100) at a distance of ten (10) feet and/or is displaying a flashing light visible in a 360 degree arc at a distance of one thousand (1,000) feet under normal atmospheric conditions.

The foregoing provisions shall not relieve the driver of an authorized emergency or police vehicle from the duty to drive with due regard for the safety of all persons, nor shall these provisions protect the driver from the consequences of his reckless disregard for the safety of others.

The foregoing provisions shall apply to the driver of an authorized emergency or police vehicle of another state of the United States who enters this state in response to an emergency call, or when in the fresh pursuit of a suspected felon as provided in section 19-701, Idaho Code, or when responding to but not upon returning from a fire alarm.

§ 49-624. Driver duty upon approaching a stationary vehicle displaying flashing lights.

The driver of a motor vehicle, upon approaching a stationary police vehicle displaying flashing lights, an authorized emergency vehicle displaying flashing lights, a stationary tow truck displaying flashing lights, or a stationary highway incident response vehicle displaying flashing lights, shall:

If the driver is traveling on a highway with two (2) or more lanes carrying traffic in the same direction, immediately reduce the speed of his vehicle below the posted speed limit, proceed with due caution and, if traveling in a lane adjacent to a stationary police vehicle displaying flashing lights, an authorized emergency vehicle displaying flashing lights, a stationary tow truck displaying flashing lights, or a highway incident response vehicle displaying flashing lights, change lanes into a lane that is not adjacent to such vehicle as soon as it is possible to do so in a manner that is reasonable and prudent under the conditions then existing, with regard to actual and potential hazards.

If the driver is traveling on a highway with one (1) lane for each direction of travel, immediately reduce the speed of his vehicle below the posted speed limit and maintain a safe speed for the road, weather, and traffic conditions until completely past the stationary police vehicle, authorized emergency vehicle, stationary tow truck, or highway incident response vehicle.

§ 49-625. Operation of vehicles on approach of authorized emergency or police vehicles.

Upon the immediate approach of an authorized emergency or police vehicle making use of an audible or visible signal, meeting the requirements of section 49-623, Idaho Code, the driver of every other vehicle shall yield the right-of-way and immediately drive to a position parallel to, and as close as possible to, the nearest edge or curb on the right side of the highway and clear of any intersection, and stop and remain in that position until the authorized emergency or police vehicle has passed, except when otherwise directed by a peace officer.

This section shall not operate to relieve the driver of an authorized emergency or police vehicle from the duty to drive with due regard for the safety of all persons using the highway.

§ 49-626. Following fire apparatus prohibited.

The driver of any vehicle other than one on official business shall not follow closer than five hundred (500) feet any fire apparatus traveling in response to a fire alarm, or stop a vehicle within five hundred (500) feet of any fire apparatus stopped in answer to a fire alarm.

§ 49-627. Crossing fire hose.

No vehicle shall be driven over any unprotected hose of a fire department when laid down on any street, road or driveway to be used at any fire or alarm of fire, without the consent of the fire department official in command.

§ 49-628, 49-629. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 49-630. Drive on right side of roadway — Exceptions.

Upon all highways of sufficient width a vehicle shall be driven upon the right half of the roadway except as follows:

When overtaking and passing another vehicle proceeding in the same direction under the rules governing such movement;

When an obstruction exists making it necessary to drive to the left of the center of the highway. Any person doing so shall yield the right-of-way to all vehicles traveling in the proper direction upon the unobstructed portion of the highway within a distance as to constitute an immediate hazard;

Upon a highway divided into three (3) marked lanes for traffic under the applicable rules; or

Upon a highway restricted to one-way traffic.

Upon all highways any vehicle proceeding at less than normal speed of traffic at the time and place and under the conditions then existing, shall be driven in the right-hand lane available for traffic, or as close as practicable to the right-hand curb or edge of the highway, except when overtaking and passing another vehicle proceeding in the same direction or when preparing for a left turn at an intersection or into a private road or driveway.

No vehicle shall be driven to the left of the center line upon any highway having four (4) or more lanes for moving traffic and providing for two-way movement of traffic, except when authorized by traffic-control device designating certain lanes to the left side of the center of the highway for use by traffic not otherwise permitted to use such lanes, or except as permitted under subsection (1)(b) of this section. This subsection shall not be construed as prohibiting the crossing of the centerline in making a left turn into or from an alley, private road or driveway.

§ 49-631. Passing vehicles proceeding in opposite directions.

Drivers of vehicles proceeding in opposite directions shall pass each other to the right. Upon highways having width for not more than one (1) line of traffic in each direction, each driver shall give to the other at least one-half the main traveled portion of the highway as possible.

§ 49-632. Overtaking a vehicle on the left.

The following shall govern the overtaking and passing of vehicles proceeding in the same direction, subject to those limitations, exceptions and special requirements stated:

The driver of a vehicle overtaking another vehicle proceeding in the same direction shall pass to the left at a safe distance and shall not again drive to the right side of the roadway until safely clear of the overtaken vehicle.

Except when overtaking and passing on the right is permitted, the driver of an overtaken vehicle shall give way to the right in favor of the overtaking vehicle on audible signal and shall not increase the speed of his vehicle until completely passed by the overtaking vehicle.

§ 49-633. When passing on the right is permitted.

The driver of a vehicle may overtake and pass upon the right of another vehicle only under the following conditions:

When the vehicle overtaken is making or about to make a left turn;

Upon a highway with unobstructed pavement of sufficient width for two (2) or more lines of vehicles moving lawfully in the direction being traveled by the overtaking vehicle.

The driver of a vehicle may overtake and pass another vehicle upon the right only under conditions permitting such movement in safety. That movement shall not be made by driving off the roadway.

§ 49-634. Limitations on overtaking on the left.

No vehicle shall be driven to the left side of the center of the highway in overtaking and passing another vehicle proceeding in the same direction, unless the left side is clearly visible and free of oncoming traffic for a sufficient distance ahead to permit the overtaking and passing to be completely made without interfering with the operation of any vehicle approaching from the opposite direction or any vehicle overtaken. In every event the overtaking vehicle must return to an authorized lane of travel as soon as practicable and in the event the passing movement involves the use of a lane authorized for vehicles approaching from the opposite direction, before coming within two hundred (200) feet of any approaching vehicle.

§ 49-635. Further limitations on driving on left of center of highway.

No vehicle shall be driven on the left side of the highway under the following conditions:

When approaching or upon the crest of a grade or a curve in the highway where the driver’s view is obstructed within a distance as to create a hazard in the event another vehicle might approach from the opposite direction;

When approaching within one hundred (100) feet of or traversing any intersection or railroad grade crossing, unless otherwise indicated by traffic control devices;

When the view is obstructed upon approaching within one hundred (100) feet of any bridge, viaduct or tunnel.

The foregoing limitations shall not apply upon a one-way highway, nor under the conditions described in subsection (1)(b) of section 49-630, Idaho Code, nor to the driver of a vehicle turning left into or from an alley, private road or driveway.

A motorist may drive to the left of no passing pavement markings to complete a passing maneuver started in advance of the no-passing zone, providing the requirements of section 49-634, Idaho Code, are met.

The provisions of this section do not apply under the conditions described in section 49-630(1)(b), Idaho Code, nor to the driver of a vehicle turning into, or from a highway.

§ 49-636. One-way highways.

Upon a highway designated for one-way traffic, a vehicle shall be driven only in the direction designated at all or such times as shall be indicated by traffic-control devices.

§ 49-637. Driving on highways laned for traffic.

Whenever any highway has been divided into two (2) or more clearly marked lanes for traffic the following, in addition to all else, shall apply:

A vehicle shall be driven as nearly as practicable entirely within a single lane and shall not be moved from that lane until the driver has first ascertained that the movement can be made with safety.

Upon a highway which is divided into three (3) lanes and provides for two-way movement of traffic, a vehicle shall not be driven in the center lane except when overtaking and passing another vehicle traveling in the same direction when the center lane is clear of traffic within a safe distance, or in preparation for making a left-turn or where the center lane is at the time allocated exclusively to traffic moving in the same direction that the vehicle is proceeding and the allocation is designated by a traffic-control device.

Traffic-control devices may be erected directing specified traffic to use a designated lane, or designate those lanes to be used by traffic moving in a particular direction, regardless of the center of the highway and drivers of vehicles shall obey the directions of every device.

Traffic-control devices may be installed prohibiting the changing of lanes on sections of highways and drivers of vehicles shall obey the directions of every device.

§ 49-638. Following too closely.

The driver of a vehicle shall not follow another vehicle more closely than is reasonable and prudent, having due regard for the speed of the vehicle, the traffic upon and the condition of the highway.

The driver of any motor vehicle drawing another vehicle when traveling upon a highway outside of a business or residential district and which is following another motor vehicle drawing another vehicle shall, whenever conditions permit, leave sufficient space so that an overtaking vehicle may enter and occupy the space without danger. This shall not prevent a motor vehicle drawing another vehicle from overtaking and passing any vehicle or combination of vehicles.

Motor vehicles being driven upon any highway outside of a business or residential district in a caravan or motorcade, whether or not towing other vehicles, shall be so operated as to allow sufficient space between each vehicle or combination of vehicles in order to enable any other vehicle to enter and occupy the space without danger. This provision shall not apply to funeral processions.

§ 49-639. Turning out of slow moving vehicles.

On a two-lane highway outside an urban area where passing is unsafe due to oncoming traffic or other conditions, the driver of a vehicle traveling slower than the normal speed of traffic and behind which three (3) or more vehicles are formed in line, shall turn off the roadway at the nearest place designated as a turnout or wherever sufficient area for a safe turnout exists, in order to permit the following vehicles to pass.

§ 49-640. Vehicles approaching or entering unmarked or uncontrolled intersection.

When two (2) vehicles approach or enter an unmarked or uncontrolled intersection from different highways at approximately the same time, the driver of the vehicle on the left shall yield the right of way to the vehicle on the right.

The right of way rule declared in subsection (1) of this section is modified as follows:

At “T” intersections where one (1) highway ends when it meets a second highway not ending at that point of convergence. When two (2) vehicles approach or enter a “T” intersection from different directions at approximately the same time, the driver of the vehicle on the highway ending at the intersection shall yield the right of way to the other vehicle;

At through highways; and

Otherwise as stated in this title.

§ 49-641. Vehicle turning left.

The driver of a vehicle intending to turn to the left within an intersection or into an alley, private road or driveway shall yield the right-of-way to any vehicle approaching from the opposite direction which is within the intersection, or so close as to constitute an immediate hazard.

§ 49-642. Vehicle entering highway.

The driver of a vehicle about to enter or cross a highway from any place other than another highway shall yield the right-of-way to all vehicles approaching on the highway to be entered or crossed.

§ 49-643. Highway construction and maintenance.

The driver of a vehicle shall yield the right-of-way to any vehicle or pedestrian actually engaged in work upon a highway within any highway construction or maintenance area indicated by traffic-control devices.

The driver of a vehicle shall yield the right-of-way to any authorized vehicle obviously and actually engaged in work upon a highway whenever that vehicle displays flashing lights meeting the requirements adopted by the board.

§ 49-644. Required position and method of turning.

The driver of a vehicle intending to turn shall do so as follows:

Both the approach for a right turn and the right turn shall be made as close as practicable to the right-hand curb or edge of the roadway.

The driver of a vehicle intending to turn left shall approach the turn in the extreme left-hand lane lawfully available to traffic moving in the direction of travel of the vehicle. Whenever practicable the left turn shall be made to the left of the center of the intersection and so as to leave the intersection or other location in the extreme left-hand lane lawfully available to traffic moving in the same direction on the highway being entered.

Where a special lane for making left turns by drivers proceeding in opposite directions has been indicated by traffic-control devices:

A left turn shall not be made from any other lane;

A vehicle shall not be driven in the lane except when preparing for or making a left turn from or into the highway or when preparing for or making a U-turn when otherwise permitted by law.

§ 49-645. Limitations on turning around.

The driver of any vehicle shall not turn the vehicle so as to proceed in the opposite direction unless such movement can be made in safety and without interfering with other traffic.

No vehicle shall be turned so as to proceed in the opposite direction upon any curve, or upon the approach to or near the crest of a grade, where the vehicle cannot be seen by the driver of any other vehicle approaching from either direction within five hundred (500) feet, or where a no-passing zone has been established.

§ 49-646. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 49-647. [Reserved.]

Whenever any person driving a vehicle approaches a railroad grade crossing under any of the circumstances stated in this section, the driver shall stop within fifty (50) feet but not less than fifteen (15) feet from the nearest rail of the railroad, and shall not proceed until he can do so safely. These requirements shall apply when:

A stop sign is in place and there is an absence of any mechanical warning signals;

A clearly visible electric or mechanical signal device gives warning of the immediate approach of a railroad train;

A crossing gate is lowered or when a flagman gives or continues to give a signal of the approach or passage of a railroad train;

A railroad train approaching within approximately fifteen hundred (1,500) feet of the highway crossing emits a signal audible from that distance and the railroad train, by reason of its speed or nearness to the crossing, is an immediate hazard;

An approaching railroad train is plainly visible and is in hazardous proximity to the crossing.

No person shall drive any vehicle through, around or under any crossing gate or barrier at a railroad crossing while the gate or barrier is closed or is being opened or closed.

§ 49-649. Compliance with stopping requirement at all railroad grade crossings.

The driver of any vehicle stopped at a railroad grade crossing shall listen and look in both directions along the track for any approaching train, and for signals indicating the approach of a train and shall not proceed until he can do so safely. Upon proceeding when it is safe to do so the driver shall cross only in a gear of the vehicle in order that there will be no necessity for manually changing gears while traversing the crossing, and the driver shall not manually shift gears while crossing the tracks.

This section shall not apply at:

Any railroad grade crossing at which traffic is controlled by a peace officer or flagman;

Any railroad grade crossing at which traffic is regulated by a traffic-control signal;

Any railroad grade crossing protected by crossing gates or an alternately flashing light signal intended to give warning of the approach of a railroad train; or

Any railroad grade crossing at which a traffic-control device gives notice that the stopping requirement imposed by this section does not apply.

§ 49-650. Moving heavy equipment at railroad grade crossings.

No person shall operate or move any crawler-type tractor, steam shovel, derrick, roller, or any equipment or structure having a normal operating speed of ten (10) or less miles per hour or a vertical body or load clearance of less than one-half (½) inch per foot of the distance between any two (2) adjacent axles or in any event of less than nine (9) inches, measured above the level surface of a highway, upon or across any tracks at a railroad grade crossing without first complying with this section.

Notice of intended crossing shall be given to a station agent of the railroad and a reasonable time be given to the railroad to provide proper protection at the crossing.

Before making the crossing the person operating or moving the vehicle or equipment shall first stop not less than fifteen (15) feet nor more than fifty (50) feet from the nearest rail of the railroad and while so stopped shall listen and look in both directions along the track for any approaching train or for signals indicating the approach of a train, and shall not proceed until the crossing can be made safely.

No crossing shall be made when warning is given by automatic signal, crossing gates, a flagman or otherwise of the immediate approach of a railroad train or car. If a flagman is provided by the railroad, movement over the crossing shall be under his direction.

§ 49-651. Emerging from alley, driveway or building.

The driver of a vehicle emerging from an alley, building, private road or driveway within a business or residential district shall stop the vehicle immediately prior to driving onto a sidewalk or onto the sidewalk area extending across the alley, building entrance, or driveway, or in the event there is no sidewalk area, shall stop at the point nearest the highway to be entered where the driver has a view of approaching traffic.

§ 49-652. School safety patrols — Failure to obey unlawful.

It shall be unlawful for the operator of any vehicle to fail to stop his or her vehicle when directed to do so by a member of a school safety patrol who is on duty and who is wearing the school-designated insignia of a school safety patrol member. It shall further be unlawful for the operator of any vehicle to disregard any other reasonable directions of a properly identified member of a school safety patrol while he or she is on duty.

For the purposes of this section, a school safety patrol consists of one (1) or more student body members appointed by an administrative officer of a school. A school safety patrol member shall wear a badge or other appropriate insignia marked “School Patrol” while in the performance of his or her duties, and may display “STOP” or other proper traffic directional signs at school crossings or other points where school children are crossing or about to cross a public street or highway.

§ 49-653. [Reserved.]

No person shall drive a vehicle at a speed greater than is reasonable and prudent under the conditions and having regard to the actual and potential hazards then existing. Consistent with the foregoing, every person shall drive at a safe and appropriate speed when approaching and crossing an intersection or railroad grade crossing, when approaching and going around a curve, when approaching a hillcrest, when traveling upon any narrow or winding highway, and when special hazards exist with respect to pedestrians or other traffic or by reason of weather or highway conditions.

Where no special hazard or condition exists that requires lower speed for compliance with subsection (1) of this section, the limits as hereinafter authorized shall be maximum lawful speeds, and no person shall drive a vehicle at a speed in excess of the maximum limits:
(2)(a) Where no special hazard or condition exists that requires lower speed for compliance with subsection (1) of this section, the limits as hereinafter authorized shall be maximum lawful speeds, and no person shall drive a vehicle at a speed in excess of the maximum limits:

Thirty-five (35) miles per hour in any residential, business or urban district, unless otherwise posted in accordance with section 49-207(2) or (3), Idaho Code;

Seventy-five (75) miles per hour on interstate highways, unless otherwise posted in accordance with section 49-201(4), Idaho Code, and provided that this speed may be increased to eighty (80) miles per hour if the department completes an engineering and traffic study on the interstate highway and concludes that the increase is in the public interest and the transportation board concurs with such conclusion;

Sixty-five (65) miles per hour on state highways, unless otherwise posted in accordance with section 49-201(4), Idaho Code, and provided that this speed may be increased to seventy (70) miles per hour if the department completes an engineering and traffic study on the state highway and concludes that the increase is in the public interest and the transportation board concurs with such conclusion;

Fifty-five (55) miles per hour in other locations, unless otherwise posted, up to a maximum of seventy (70) miles per hour.

Subject to all other applicable motor vehicles laws, a driver of a passenger car, motorcycle or pickup truck, not towing any other vehicle, may exceed the posted speed limit by up to fifteen (15) miles per hour while passing another vehicle traveling at less than the posted speed limit, in order to safely pass the vehicle. The overtaking vehicle shall return to the right-hand lane and reduce speed to the posted speed limit as soon as practicable. This paragraph shall be applicable only to passing on the left upon roadways divided into two (2) lanes providing only one (1) lane of traffic in each direction and where the posted speed limit is fifty-five (55) miles per hour or greater. This paragraph shall not be applicable in construction zones. For purposes of basic rule violations and penalties imposed pursuant to this section and Idaho infraction rule 9, the fifteen (15) mile per hour allowance in passing situations provided in this paragraph shall be deemed to be the maximum speed limit from which fines are determined.
(3) For vehicles with five (5) or more axles operating at a gross weight of more than twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds the maximum lawful speed limit on interstate highways in nonurban areas shall not exceed ten (10) miles per hour less for vehicles with less than five (5) axles and operating at a gross weight of twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds or less, and in urban areas the maximum lawful speed limit on interstate highways for such vehicles shall not exceed sixty-five (65) miles per hour.

§ 49-655. Minimum speed regulation.

No person shall drive a motor vehicle at such a slow speed as to impede the normal and reasonable movement of traffic except when reduced speed is necessary for safe operation or in compliance with the law. Notwithstanding any minimum speed that may be authorized and posted pursuant to this section, no person shall operate a vehicle in the extreme left-hand lane of a controlled-access highway for a period of time that impedes the flow of other traffic traveling at a lawful rate of speed.

§ 49-656. Special speed limitations.

No person shall drive a vehicle over any bridge or other elevated structure constituting a part of a highway at a speed which is greater than the maximum speed which can be maintained with safety to the bridge or structure, when the structure is posted as provided in this title.

§ 49-657. Work zone speed limits — Penalty.

No person shall operate a vehicle in excess of the posted maximum speed limit established for a highway work zone when the work zone is designated by appropriately placed signs indicating: the work zone; the reduced speed limit; and notice of an enhanced penalty for exceeding the reduced speed limit.

Violation of the provisions of this section shall be an infraction punishable by a fixed penalty of fifty dollars ($50.00).

§ 49-658. School zone speed limit — Penalty.

No person shall operate a vehicle in excess of the posted maximum speed limit established for a posted school zone. If a posted school zone speed limit sign includes the words “when children are present,” the term shall mean one (1) or more children. The definition applies to children present on the same side of the street as the school building or across the street from the school building in any direction within the marked school zone.

Violation of the provisions of this section shall be an infraction punishable by a minimum penalty of not less than seventy-five dollars ($75.00).

§ 49-659. Stopping, standing or parking outside business or residential districts.

Outside a business or residential district no person shall stop, park or leave standing any vehicle, whether attended or unattended, upon the roadway when it is practicable to stop, park or so leave the vehicle off the roadway, but in every event in an unobstructed width of the highway opposite a standing vehicle shall be left for the free passage of other vehicles and a clear view of the stopped vehicle shall be available from a distance of two hundred (200) feet in each direction upon the highway.

This section and sections 49-660 and 49-661, Idaho Code, shall not apply to the driver of any vehicle which is disabled in such a manner and to an extent that it is impossible to avoid stopping and temporarily leaving the vehicle in that position.